Illinois, session 104th, HB1680.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Racial Classification Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 50/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Uniform Racial Classification Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-982, eff. 8-18-14.)